District of Columbia statutes.
16-4405

Application for judicial relief.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in § 16-4427, an application for judicial relief under this chapter shall be made by motion to the court and heard in the manner provided by law or rule of court for making and hearing motions.

(b)

Unless a civil action involving the agreement to arbitrate is pending, notice of an initial motion to the court under this chapter shall be served in the manner provided by law for the service of a summons in a civil action. Otherwise, notice of the motion shall be given in the manner provided by law or rule of court for serving motions in pending cases.

History

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-111, § 2(b), 55 DCR 1847

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-4404.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 5 of the Uniform Arbitration Act (2000).